Utah statutes.
34-44-103.   Jurisdiction in courts.

An action under this chapter may be brought against a principal in a court of this state if:

(1)  the principal enters into a business relationship in this state with a sales representative to solicit orders for a product or a service; or

(2) (a)  a product of the principal is:

(i)  manufactured, distributed, sold, or received in this state; or

(ii)  imported to or from this state; or

(b)  a service of the principal is provided in this state.



Enacted by Chapter 65, 2007 General Session

